Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.060

Solid waste disposal—Ownership of solid wastes—Responsibility for handling.

Ownership of solid wastes shall be vested in the person or local jurisdiction managing disposal and/or resource recovery facilities upon the arrival of said solid wastes at said facility: PROVIDED, That the original owner retains ownership of the solid wastes until they arrive at the disposal site or transfer station or detachable container, and the original owner has the right of recovery to any valuable items inadvertently discarded: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the person or agency providing the collection service shall be responsible for the proper handling of the solid wastes from the point of collection to the disposal or recovery facility.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 58 s 4.]